California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(6) The increase in the basic foster family home rate shall apply only to children placed in a licensed foster family home receiving the basic rate or in an approved home of a relative or nonrelative extended family member, as described in Section 362.7, a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, or a nonrelated legal guardian receiving
 the basic rate. The increased rate shall not be used to compute the monthly amount that may be paid to licensed foster family agencies for the placement of children in certified foster homes.

(d) (1) (A) Beginning with the 1991–92 fiscal year, the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be adjusted by the percentage changes in the California Necessities Index, computed pursuant to the methodology described in Section 11453, subject to the availability of funds.

(B) In addition to the adjustment in subparagraph (A) effective January 1, 2000, the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall be increased by 2.36 percent rounded to the nearest dollar.

(C) Effective January 1, 2008, the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a), as adjusted pursuant to subparagraph
 (B), shall be increased by 5 percent, rounded to the nearest dollar. The increased rate shall not be used to compute the monthly amount that may be paid to licensed foster family agencies for the placement of children in certified foster family homes, and shall not be used to recompute the foster care maintenance payment that would have been paid based on the age-related, state-approved foster family home care rate and any applicable specialized care increment, for any adoption assistance agreement entered into prior to October 1, 1992, or in any subsequent reassessment for adoption assistance agreements executed before January 1, 2008.

(2) (A) Any county that, as of the 1991–92 fiscal year, receives state participation for a basic rate that exceeds the amount set forth in the schedule of basic rates in subdivision (a) shall receive an increase each year in state participation for that basic rate of one-half of the
 percentage adjustments specified in paragraph (1) until the difference between the county’s adjusted state participation level for its basic rate and the adjusted schedule of basic rates is eliminated.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), all counties for the 1999–2000 fiscal year and the 2007–08 fiscal year shall receive an increase in state participation for the basic rate of the entire percentage adjustment described in paragraph (1).

(3) If a county has, after receiving the adjustments specified in paragraph (2), a state participation level for a basic rate that is below the amount set forth in the adjusted schedule of basic rates for that fiscal year, the state participation level for that rate shall be further increased to the amount specified in the adjusted schedule of basic rates.

(e) (1) As used in this section, “specialized care increment” means an amount paid on behalf of a child requiring specialized care to a home listed in subdivision (g) in addition to the rates set forth in subdivisions (g) and (h). Notwithstanding subdivision (g), the specialized care increment shall not be paid to a nonminor dependent placed in a supervised independent living placement as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400. A county or tribe that has entered into a Title IV-E intergovernmental agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 may have a ratesetting system for specialized care to pay for the additional care and supervision needed to address the behavioral, emotional, and physical requirements of foster children. A county or tribe that has entered into a Title IV-E intergovernmental agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 may modify its specialized care rate system as needed, to accommodate changing specialized placement needs of children.

(2) (A) The department shall have the authority to review the county’s or tribe’s specialized care information, including the criteria and methodology used for compliance with state and federal law, and to require changes if necessary to conform to state and federal law.

(B) The department shall make available to the public each county’s or tribe’s specialized care information, including the criteria and methodology used to determine the specialized care increments.

(3) Upon a request by a county or tribe that has entered into a Title IV-E intergovernmental agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 for technical assistance, specialized care information shall be provided by the department within 90 days of the request to the department.

(4) (A) Except for subparagraph (B), beginning January 1, 1990, specialized care increments shall be adjusted in accordance with the methodology for the schedule of basic rates described in subdivision (g).

(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11460, for the 1993–94 fiscal year, an amount equal to 5 percent of the State Treasury appropriation for family homes shall be added to the total augmentation for the AFDC-FC program in order to provide incentives and assistance to counties in the area of specialized care. This appropriation shall be used, but not limited to, encouraging counties to implement or expand specialized care payment systems, to recruit and train foster parents for the placement of children with specialized care needs, and to develop county systems to encourage the placement of children in family homes. It is the intent of the Legislature that in the use of these funds, federal
 financial participation shall be claimed whenever possible.

(C) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the specialized care increment shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in the 2011–12 or 2012–13 fiscal years.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a county may choose to apply a cost-of-living adjustment to its specialized care increment during the 2011–12 or 2012–13 fiscal years. To the extent that a county chooses to apply a cost-of-living adjustment during that time, the state shall not participate in the costs of that adjustment.

(iii) To the extent that federal financial participation is available for a cost-of-living adjustment made by a county pursuant to clause (ii), it is the intent of the Legislature that the federal funding shall be utilized.

(5) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this subdivision shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) As used in this section, “clothing allowance” means the amount paid by a county, at the county’s option, in addition to the rates set forth in subdivisions (g) and (h) for the provision of additional clothing for a child, including, but not limited to, an initial supply of clothing and school or other uniforms. The frequency and level of funding shall be based on the needs of the child, as determined by the county.

(2) The state shall no longer participate in any clothing allowance in addition to the basic rate, commencing with the
 2011–12 fiscal year.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, for a child, or on and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor dependent, placed in a licensed foster family home or with a resource family, or placed in a tribally approved home as defined in Section 224.1, or placed in an approved home of a relative or the approved home of a nonrelative extended family member as described in Section 362.7, or placed on and after January 1, 2012, in a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, the per child per month basic rate in the following schedule shall be in effect for the period commencing July 1, 2011, or the date specified in the final order, for which the time to appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association v. William Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. C 07-08056 WHA), whichever is earlier,
 through June 30, 2012:AgeBasic rate 0–4$609 5–8$660 9–11$69512–14$72715–20$761(2) Commencing July 1, 2011, the basic rate set forth in this subdivision shall be annually adjusted on July 1 by the annual percentage change in the California Necessities Index applicable to the calendar year within which each July 1 occurs.

(3) Subdivisions (e) and (f) shall apply to payments made pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) (A) (i) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, the department shall develop a basic rate in coordination with the development of the foster family agency rate authorized in Section 11463 that ensures a child placed in a home-based setting described in paragraph (1), and a child placed in a certified family home or with a resource family approved by a foster family agency, is eligible for the same basic rate set forth in this paragraph.

(ii) The rates developed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be lower than the rates proposed as part of the Governor’s 2016 May Revision.

(iii) Unless the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) applies to a child or nonminor dependent, a certified family home of a foster family agency shall be paid the basic rate set forth in this paragraph only through December 31, 2028, or 24 months from the date required under paragraph (9) of subdivision (h), whichever is later.

(B) The basic rate paid to either a certified family home or a resource family approved by a foster family agency shall be paid by the agency to the certified family home or resource family from the rate that is paid to the agency pursuant to Section 11463.

(C) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative
 Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the basic rates and the manner in which they are determined shall be set forth in written directives until regulations are adopted.

(D) The basic rates set forth in written directives or regulations pursuant to subparagraph (C) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029, or 24 months from the date required under paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of
 this section, whichever is later.

(5) (A) (i) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the rate paid for a nonminor dependent placed in a supervised independent living placement in California, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, shall be supplemented with a housing supplement, which shall be calculated by the department as the difference between one-half of the federal fiscal year 2023 fair market rent for a two-bedroom apartment in the county in which the nonminor resides and 30 percent of the rate established pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision.

(ii) A nonminor dependent shall not receive a monthly rate less than the rate established pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision.

(B) The supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall commence on July 1, 2025, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement it, whichever is later.

(C) The monthly housing supplement payment made pursuant to this section shall be added to the rate paid to a nonminor dependent placed in a supervised independent living placement and shall be prorated based on the number of days in a month the nonminor dependent was in the placement eligible for the supplement. Notwithstanding Section 11466.24, overpayments shall not be collected on the housing supplement pursuant to this paragraph.

(D) The department shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the CalSAWS to develop and implement the
 necessary system changes to implement the housing supplement provided pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(E) Consistent with the implementation timeline in subparagraph (B), the department shall annually calculate the housing supplement described in this paragraph by November 1 of each year and shall inform the CalSAWS of the amount of the supplement by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions. The department shall annually inform county welfare agencies in the month of July of the following year of the amount of the supplement by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions.

(F) For purposes of this paragraph, “fair market rent” means the federal fiscal year 2023 rent calculated for the fair market rent system developed by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for use in determining the allowable rent level for an individual
 who participates in the Housing Choice Voucher program, including the cost of housing and utilities, except for telephone, cable, and internet, and is calculated for each county by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(h) Unless otherwise specified by law, and except as provided in paragraphs (6) to (8), inclusive, in accordance with the schedules provided in paragraph (4) and Sections 16562 and 16565, the per child per month rate for every child in foster care shall be based on the Tiered Rate Structure as set forth in this subdivision.

(1) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of the Tiered Rate Structure established in this section:

(A) “Integrated Practice-Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths” or “IP-CANS” means a validated functional assessment tool that supports
 decisionmaking and allows for the monitoring of outcomes and services, assesses the well-being of children through the identification of their strengths and needs, and determines their tier as part of the Tiered Rate Structure established in this subdivision.

(B) “Tiered Rate Structure” means the framework that establishes a rate structure consisting of three tiers developed by the department based on a statistical analysis of the IP-CANS assessment of California foster children. The tier levels are designed to address the levels of care and needs of the children in each tier regardless of their placement setting.

(2) The Tiered Rate Structure shall consist of the following three components:

(A) An amount paid to the foster care provider in return for care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section
 11460.

(B) Strengths Building Funding to provide for a child’s strengths building objectives, as identified by the IP-CANS, paid pursuant to the Strengths Building Child and Family Determination Program established in Section 16565.

(C) Immediate Needs Funding to provide for a child’s immediate needs as identified by the IP-CANS, paid pursuant to the Immediate Needs Program established in Section 16562.

(3) As the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, foster care providers shall be paid a per child per month rate in return for care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, excluding paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision, based on the child’s tier established by the results of the child’s IP-CANS assessment, as follows:

Tier
 1: $1788

Tier 2: $3490

Tier 3: $6296 [Ages 0-5]

Tier 3+: $6296 [Ages 6+]

(4) The components of the Tiered Rate Structure described in paragraph (2) shall be phased in as follows:

(A) (i) For new entries
 or reentries into foster care, as defined by the department, beginning on the date required by paragraph (9), the components of the Tiered Rate Structure shall be effective on the date on which the IP-CANS assessment is completed and entered into the statewide child welfare information system, as prescribed by Section 16560, or 60 days after the child enters or reenters foster care, whichever comes first.

(ii) A rate of two
 thousand five hundred dollars ($2500) for the Care and Supervision component, as set forth in paragraph (3), shall be paid pending completion and entry into the statewide child welfare information system of the IP-CANS assessment to determine the child’s tier, as prescribed by Section 16560. This rate shall be referred to as the “entry
 rate.”

(iii) Provided all state and federal rate and licensing requirements are met, the entry rate for a child or nonminor dependent placed with a foster family agency or short-term residential therapeutic program shall also include a rate of one thousand six hundred ten dollars ($1,610) for administrative and other activities, as set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11460.

(iv) Beginning July 1, 2028, the entry rate shall be annually adjusted on July 1 by the annual percentage change in the California Necessities Index that applies to the year in which the annual adjustment is made.

(v) If the IP-CANS assessment is not completed and entered into the statewide
 child welfare information system within 60 days of a child’s entry or reentry into foster care, the components of the Tiered Rate Structure shall be effective retroactive to 60 days after the child enters or reenters foster care.

(B) For all other children in foster care placement on July 1, 2027, the components of the Tiered Rate Structure as set forth in paragraph
 (2) shall be paid consistent with the child’s tier as determined by the child’s IP-CANS assessment, pursuant to a schedule to be determined by the department, and developed in collaboration with county placing agencies, tribes, and stakeholders, but in no case later than January 1, 2029, or 24 months from the date required under paragraph (9), whichever is later.

(5) Beginning July 1, 2028, and on July 1 of each fiscal year thereafter, the rate set forth in paragraph (3) shall be annually adjusted by the annual percentage change in the California Necessities Index applicable to the calendar year within which each July 1 occurs.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the following care and supervision rates shall apply in the following settings:

(A) The care and supervision rate
 paid on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent placed in a setting described in subdivision (d) of Section 11402 shall be the rate set forth in Section 11403.3.

(B) The rate paid for a nonminor dependent placed in a setting described in subdivision (w) of Section 11400 shall be the rate set forth in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (g). Beginning July 1, 2027, or on the date required under paragraph (9), whichever is later, the rate paid shall consist of the sum of the following:

(i) A rate equivalent to Tier 1 of the care and supervision rate in paragraph (3) inclusive of any annual adjustments described in paragraph (5).

(ii) A rate equivalent to Tier 1 of the Strengths Building Funding set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 16565.

(iii) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the housing supplement described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), if applicable.

(C) The rate paid on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent placed in a setting described in subdivision (h) of Section 11402 shall be the rate established by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, children and nonminor dependents who are both regional center consumers and recipients of Aid to Families With Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC) or the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program
 (ARC) shall be assessed for the dual agency rate and supplement, if applicable, according to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 11464 or subdivision (b) of Section 11461.3, as applicable, and shall also be separately assessed for the tiered rate described in paragraph (3), plus any applicable county specialized care increment, and receive the rate that is higher. Notwithstanding the higher applicable rate received, regional centers shall separately purchase or secure services contained in the child’s or nonminor dependent’s Individualized Family Services Plan (IFSP) or Individual Program Plan (IPP) pursuant to Section 4684.

(7) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the Care and Supervision component shall not apply to a child or nonminor dependent placed in a temporary shelter care facility or transitional shelter care facility.

(8) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the Tiered Rate Structure shall not
 apply to a child whose nonrelated legal guardianship was ordered in probate court pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1510) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Probate Code.

(9) (A) The three components of the Tiered Rate Structure described in paragraph (2) shall become operative on July 1, 2027, or the date after both of the following events have occurred, whichever is later:

 (i) The department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement the Tiered Rate Structure.

(ii) The Legislature makes an appropriation for the express purpose of implementing this subdivision.

(B) This paragraph shall not be interpreted to cease or delay any funding or action required to perform the automation or other activities necessary to prepare for the implementation of the Tiered Rate Structure.

(10) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations no later than January 1, 2030.

(i) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 24.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure quality care for children who are placed in foster family homes. Therefore, the State Department of Social Services is directed to work with counties, foster parent associations, representatives of the community colleges, representatives of foster youth organizations, legislative staff members, and other interested parties concerning training requirements, experience, and retention of foster parents and the capacity of foster homes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 245.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.3.

(a) The Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program is hereby established for the purpose of making the amount paid to an approved relative caregiver for the in-home care of children and nonminor dependents placed with them who are ineligible for AFDC-FC payments equal to the amount paid on behalf of children and nonminor dependents who are eligible for AFDC-FC payments.

(b) Unless the child or nonminor dependent is eligible for a higher dual agency rate and supplement, if applicable, pursuant to Section 11464, the county with payment responsibility shall pay an approved relative caregiver a per child per month rate at the child’s or nonminor dependent’s assessed level of care, as set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463, or on and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate developed pursuant to the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable, in
 return for the care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, of the child or nonminor dependent if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The child or nonminor dependent resides in California.

(2) The child or nonminor dependent is described by subdivision (b), (c), or (e) of Section 11401 and the county welfare department or the county probation department is responsible for the placement and care of the child or nonminor dependent.

(3) The child or nonminor dependent is not eligible for AFDC-FC while placed with the approved relative caregiver because the child or nonminor dependent is not eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be interpreted to
 prevent a county from supplementing the payment made to the approved relative caregiver with any county optional program, including, but not limited to, a specialized care increment, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 11461, or a clothing allowance, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 11461.

(d) Any income or benefits received by an eligible child or the approved relative caregiver on behalf of the eligible child or nonminor dependent that would be offset against the rate paid to a foster care provider shall be offset from any funds that are not CalWORKs funds paid to the approved relative caregiver pursuant to this section.

(e) Counties shall recoup an overpayment in the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program received by an approved relative caregiver using the standards and processes for overpayment recoupment that are applicable to overpayments to an
 approved resource family, as specified in Section 11466.24. Recouped overpayments shall not be subject to remittance to the federal government. Any overpaid funds that are collected by the counties shall be remitted to the state after subtracting both of the following:

(1) An amount not to exceed the county share of the CalWORKs portion of the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program payment, if any.

(2) Any other county funds that were included in the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program payment.

(f) To the extent permitted by federal law, payments received by the approved relative caregiver from the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program shall not be considered income for the purpose of determining other public benefits.

(g) Prior to
 referral of any individual or recipient, or that person’s case, to the local child support agency for child support services pursuant to Section 17415 of the Family Code, the county human services agency shall determine if an applicant or recipient has good cause for noncooperation, as set forth in Section 11477.04. If the applicant or recipient claims good cause exception at any subsequent time to the county human services agency or the local child support agency, the local child support agency shall suspend child support services until the county social services agency determines the good cause claim, as set forth in Section 11477.04. If good cause is determined to exist, the local child support agency shall suspend child support services until the applicant or recipient requests their resumption, and shall take other measures that are necessary to protect the applicant or recipient and the children. If the applicant or recipient is the parent of the child for whom aid is sought and the parent is found to
 have not cooperated without good cause as provided in Section 11477.04, the applicant’s or recipient’s family grant shall be reduced by 25 percent for the time the failure to cooperate lasts.

(h) Consistent with Section 17552 of the Family Code, if aid is paid under this chapter on behalf of a child who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and whose parent or guardian is receiving reunification services, the county human services agency shall determine, prior to referral of the case to the local child support agency for child support services, whether the referral is in the best interest of the child, taking into account both of the following:

(1) Whether the payment of support by the parent will pose a barrier to the proposed reunification in that the payment of support will compromise the parent’s ability to meet the requirements of the parent’s reunification
 plan.

(2) Whether the payment of support by the parent will pose a barrier to the proposed reunification in that the payment of support will compromise the parent’s current or future ability to meet the financial needs of the child.

(i) For purposes of this section, an “approved relative caregiver” includes a relative, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 319, who has been approved as a resource family pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and effective the first of the month following the date the department issues comprehensive policy, fiscal, and claiming instructions that will enable counties to implement this subdivision pending the establishment of a new aid code, if needed, a child or nonminor dependent placed out of state in the home of
 a relative shall be eligible for payment pursuant to this section under the following conditions:

(A) The home of the relative is licensed or approved consistent with the requirements of the state in which the home is located.

(B) The child is described by paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b).

(C) All other eligibility conditions are met.

(2) Payments made pursuant to this section shall be equal to, but not exceed, the foster care rate set by the rate-setting authority of the state in which the home is located, subject to any offset required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(k) The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than January 1, 2023. The
 department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, any emergency regulation previously adopted pursuant to this section. The initial adoption of regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(l) Notwithstanding any other
 law, when the placement of a child with a relative, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 319, has been authorized by the juvenile court and the placement is ineligible for both emergency caregiver funding pursuant to Section 11461.36 and AFDC-FC due to the denial of resource family approval, the placement shall be funded pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 25.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.36.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide support to emergency caregivers, as defined in subdivision (c), who care for children and nonminor dependents before approval of an application under the Resource Family Approval Program or a tribally approved home.

(b) For placements made on and after July 1, 2018, each county shall provide a payment equivalent to the resource family basic level rate of the home-based family care rate structure, pursuant to Section 11463, to an emergency caregiver on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent placed in the home of
 the caregiver pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 309, Section 361.45, Section 727.05, or clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 319, or based on a compelling reason pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16519.5, subject to the availability of state and federal funds pursuant to subdivision (e), if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The child or nonminor dependent is not otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC or the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program, pursuant to Section 11461.3, while placed in the home of the emergency caregiver.

(2) The child or nonminor dependent resides in California.

(3) The emergency caregiver has signed and submitted to the county an application for resource family
 approval or has initiated a tribally approved home process.

(4) An application for the Emergency Assistance Program has been completed.

(c) For purposes of this section, an “emergency caregiver” means an individual who has a pending resource family application filed with an appropriate agency on or after July 1, 2018, and who meets one of the following requirements:

(1) The individual has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.4.

(2) The individual has successfully completed the home environment assessment portion of the resource family approval pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16519.5.

(d) The beginning date of aid for
 payments made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be the date of placement.

(e) Funding for payments made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be as follows:

(1) For emergency or compelling reason placements made during the 2018–19 fiscal year:

(A) Payments shall be made to an emergency caregiver through the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant.

(B) The county shall be solely responsible for the nonfederal share of cost.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the child or nonminor dependent is determined to be ineligible for the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy
 Families block grant, 70 percent of the cost of emergency payments made to the emergency caregiver shall be funded by the department and 30 percent shall be funded by the county.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), payments required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for the federal or state share of cost upon approval or denial of the resource family application, consistent with subdivision (g), beyond 180 days, or, if the conditions of subparagraph (E) are met, beyond 365 days, whichever occurs first.

(E) The federal and state share of payment made pursuant to this paragraph shall be available beyond 180 days of payments, and up to 365 days of payments, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) On a monthly basis, the county has documented good cause for the
 delay in approving the resource family application that is outside the direct control of the county, which may include delays in processing background check clearances or exemptions, medical examinations, or delays that are based on the needs of the family.

(ii) On a monthly basis, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department, or their designee, has been notified of the delay in approving the resource family application and that notification is documented in the resource family approval file.

(iii) On a monthly basis, the county provides to the department a list of the resource family applications that have been pending for more than 90 days and the reason for the delays.

(2) For emergency or compelling reason placements made during the 2019–20 fiscal year:

(A) Payments shall be made to an emergency caregiver through the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant.

(B) The county shall be solely responsible for the nonfederal share of cost.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the child or nonminor dependent is determined to be ineligible for the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant, 70 percent of the cost of emergency payments made to the emergency caregiver shall be funded by the department and 30 percent shall be funded by the county.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), payments required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be
 eligible for the federal or state share of cost upon approval or denial of the resource family application, consistent with subdivision (g), or beyond 120 days, whichever occurs first.

(E) The federal and state share of payment made pursuant to this paragraph shall be available beyond 120 days of payments, and up to 365 days of payments, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) On a monthly basis, the county has documented good cause for the delay in approving the resource family application that is outside the direct control of the county, which may include delays in processing background check clearances or exemptions, medical examinations, or delays that are based on the needs of the family.

(ii) On a monthly basis, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department, or their designee,
 or the chief probation officer, or their designee, as applicable, has been notified of the delay in approving the resource family application and that notification is documented in the resource family approval file.

(iii) On a monthly basis, the county provides to the department a list of the resource family applications that have been pending for more than 120 days and the reason for the delays.

(3) For emergency or compelling reason placements made during the 2020–21 fiscal year:

(A) Payments shall be made to an emergency caregiver through the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant.

(B) The county shall be solely responsible for the nonfederal share of cost.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the child or nonminor dependent is determined to be ineligible for the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant, 70 percent of the cost of emergency payments made to the emergency caregiver shall be funded by the department and 30 percent shall be funded by the county.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), payments required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for the federal or state share of cost upon approval or denial of the resource family application, consistent with subdivision (g), or beyond 120 days, whichever occurs first.

(E) The federal and state share of payment made pursuant to this paragraph shall be available beyond 120 days of payments, and up to
 365 days of payments, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) On a monthly basis, the county has documented good cause for delay in approving the resource family application that is outside the direct control of the county, which may include delays in processing background check clearances or exemptions, medical examinations, or delays that are based on the needs of the family.

(ii) On a monthly basis, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department, or their designees, or the chief probation officer, or their designee, as applicable, has been notified of the delay in approving the resource family application and that notification is documented in the resource family approval file.

(iii) On a monthly basis, the county provides to the department a list of the resource family applications
 that have been pending for more than 120 days and the reasons for the delays.

(F) The 365-day payment limitation pursuant to subparagraph (E) and accompanying rules and regulations is suspended through June 30, 2021, subject to guidance from the State Department of Social Services.

(4) For emergency or compelling reason placements made during the 2021–22 fiscal year:

(A) Payments shall be made to an emergency caregiver through the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant.

(B) The county shall be solely responsible for the nonfederal share of cost.
